dev/apertium-urd.urd.dix
    <pardef n="سہ/نا__vblex_vcaus1">
      <e><p>          <l>ارنا</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ارنے</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>اروں</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>اریں</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>اروں</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>اریں</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ارو</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ارو</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ارو</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ارو</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ار</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ارو</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ار</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ارو</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ارو</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>اریے</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>اریں</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>اریے</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>اریں</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ارو</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>اریے</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>اریں</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>اریے</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>اریں</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ارے</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>اریں</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ارے</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>اریں</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ارے</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>اریں</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ارے</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>اریں</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ارتا</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ارتے</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ارتی</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ارتیں</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ارتے</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ارتے</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ارتی</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ارتیں</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ارتیں</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ارتا</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ارتے</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ارتی</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ارتیں</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ارتے</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ارتے</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ارتی</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ارتیں</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ارتیں</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ارتا</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ارتے</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ارتی</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ارتیں</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ارتا</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ارتے</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ارتی</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ارتیں</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ارا</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vcaus1"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    <e lm="سہنا"><i>سہ</i><par n="سہ/نا__vblex_vcaus1"/></e>
